Hawaii, session 2026, SB3133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that access to preventive medicine, including evidence-based clinical preventive services, is fundamental to maintaining and improving the health of the people of Hawaii. These essential preventive benefits and protections are increasingly placed in jeopardy due to unwarranted skepticism towards long-established and scientifically validated medical recommendations. The legislature further finds that clinical preventive services recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices and the United States Preventive Services Task Force, such as immunizations and other evidence-based preventive interventions, are currently required to be covered by health insurance without cost-sharing under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.  However, if these recommendations are withdrawn, invalidated, or otherwise no longer recognized under federal law, these preventive medical services may cease to be covered without cost-sharing. The loss of no-cost access to these preventive services would likely increase out-of-pocket health care expenses for Hawaii residents, causing many individuals to delay or forego preventive care.  Such delays would increase the risk of infectious disease outbreaks and contribute to the growing burden of chronic disease across the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to ensure continued access to preventive medicine for Hawaii residents by: (1)  Establishing the Hawaii preventive services advisory committee to serve in an advisory capacity to the department of health on matters relating to clinical preventive services; (2)  Authorizing the department of health to issue clinical preventive service recommendations; (3)  Providing immunity for health care professionals who provide clinical preventive services based on recommendations of the department of health; and (4)  Requiring coverage of evidence-based clinical preventive services without cost-sharing. SECTION 2. Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding three new sections to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§321-A  Hawaii preventive services advisory committee; established.  (a) There is established within the department of health the Hawaii preventive services advisory committee, which shall serve in an advisory capacity to the department of health on matters relating to clinical preventive services. (b) The Hawaii preventive services advisory committee shall be composed of ten members.  The director of health or the director's designee shall serve as an ex officio nonvoting chair of the advisory committee and invite one representative from each of the following organizations to serve as the advisory committee members: (1)  American Academy of Pediatrics, Hawaii Chapter; (2)  Hawaii Academy of Family Physicians; (3)  American Academy of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, Hawaii Section; (4)  American College of Physicians, Hawaii Chapter; (5)  Hawaii Association of Professional Nurses; (6)  Hawaii Medical Association; (7)  Hawaii Association of Health Plans; (8)  Healthcare Association of Hawaii; (9)  Hawaii Primary Care Association, which may nominate a consumer representative knowledgeable about consumer perspectives or community aspects of clinical prevention; and (10)  Hawaii Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics, who may nominate a representative who is a registered dietitian nutritionist or licensed nutrition professional. (c) The members of the Hawaii preventive services advisory committee shall be subject to chapter 84. (d) Each member shall serve for a term of up to four years, as determined by the director of health; provided that no members shall serve more than eight consecutive years.  The director of health or the director's designee may designate staggered term lengths for initial members, including terms of one, two, three, or four years. (e) The members of the Hawaii preventive services advisory committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (f) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action against, the Hawaii preventive services advisory committee, its members, or the department of health for any act or omission done in good faith in the performance of their duties or functions under this section, including the development, adoption, issuance, or implementation of clinical preventive service recommendations; provided that this subsection shall not be construed to limit or affect the liability of any person arising from the provision of direct medical care. §321-B  Hawaii preventive services advisory committee; scope; duties.  (a)  The scope of the Hawaii preventive services advisory committee shall be limited to recommendations relating to clinical preventive service recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task Force that have been assigned a grade of A or B as of July 1, 2025, and to recommendations relating to immunizations. (b) The Hawaii preventive services advisory committee shall base its recommendations on the best available scientific evidence and shall give due consideration to recommendations issued by recognized national medical professional organizations. (c) The Hawaii preventive services advisory committee shall make its recommendations independently of any recommendations developed through, or in coordination with, any multi-state alliance or agreement made for the purpose of issuing clinical prevention service recommendations. (d) The department of health shall consider recommendations submitted by the Hawaii preventive services advisory committee when issuing clinical preventive service recommendations pursuant to section 321-31. §321-C  Preventive services; immunity.  (a) No person shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or professional disciplinary action or deemed to have engaged in unprofessional conduct for providing clinical preventive services in accordance with recommendations made pursuant to section 321-31. (b) No professional organization or association, health care provider, or health care facility shall subject any person to discipline, suspension, loss of license, loss of privileges, loss of membership, or other penalty for providing clinical preventive services in accordance with recommendations made pursuant to section 321-31. (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, restrict, or prohibit any claim, cause of action, or right of recovery against any person or entity for injury arising from negligence." SECTION 3. Chapter 431, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to article 10A, part I, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§431:10A-    Preventive services coverage; department of health recommendations.  (a)  Each individual and group policy of accident and health or sickness insurance issued or renewed in the State after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage, without any deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or other cost-sharing requirements, for clinical preventive services recommended by the department of health pursuant to section 321-31. (b) Coverage under this section shall include items and services furnished by a provider acting within the scope of the provider's license. (c) This section shall not be construed to limit any broader coverage or benefits related to preventive services otherwise required under this chapter. (d) This section shall not apply to disability income, specified disease, medicare supplement, hospital indemnity policies, or any health insurance policy for which federal law would require the State to pay the defrayal cost of otherwise noncovered state mandated benefits." SECTION 4. Chapter 432, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to article 1, part VI, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§432:1-    Preventive services coverage; department of health recommendations.  (a)  Each individual hospital and medical service plan contract delivered or issued for delivery in the State after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage, without any deductible, copayment, coinsurance, or other cost-sharing requirements, for clinical preventive services recommended by the department of health pursuant to section 321-31. (b) Coverage under this section shall include items and services furnished by a provider acting within the scope of the provider's license. (c) This section shall not be construed to limit any broader coverage or benefits related to preventive services otherwise required under this chapter. (d) This section shall not apply to disability income, specified disease, medicare supplement, hospital indemnity policies, or any medical service plan contract for which federal law would require the State to pay the defrayal cost of otherwise noncovered state mandated benefits." SECTION 5. Section 321-31, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§321-31  Functions of the department.  The powers, duties, and functions of the department of health relating to preventive medicine shall be as follows: (1)  To supervise and coordinate activities in the fields of preventive medicine, including cancer control, crippled children, epidemiology, geriatrics, laboratories, maternal and child health, mental hygiene, nutrition, and communicable diseases; (2)  To formulate and put into effect throughout the State educational programs for the purposes of preventing and reducing disease and disability; (3)  To engage in the collection and analysis of statistical information pertinent to any of its activities; (4)  To cooperate with and propose methods and programs to other governmental agencies relating to the fields of preventive medicine; (5)  To serve as the coordinating agency for programs [which] that provide for a range of child abuse and neglect prevention services in relation to assessed needs, regardless of whether the programs are conducted by the department, other government agencies, or private organizations and to coordinate the prevention programs with child abuse and neglect treatment services; provided that this paragraph shall not be interpreted to compel a specified level of services; [and] (6)  To make clinical preventive service recommendations based on the recommendations of the Hawaii preventive services advisory committee established pursuant to section 321-A, or pursuant to an alliance entered into with another state for the purpose of issuing clinical preventive service recommendations; (7)  To issue standing orders for medications and immunizations; and [(6)] (8)  To perform such other appropriate functions as may be required." SECTION 6. Section 431:10A-115.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows: "(b) Child health supervision services shall include twelve visits at approximately the following intervals: birth; two months; four months; six months; nine months; twelve months; fifteen months; eighteen months; two years; three years; four years; and five years.  Services to be covered at each visit shall include a history, physical examination, developmental assessment, anticipatory guidance, immunizations, and laboratory tests, in keeping with prevailing medical standards.  For the purposes of this subsection, [the term] "prevailing medical standards" means the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the American Academy of Pediatrics[;], or the recommendations of the department of health made pursuant to section 321-31; provided that if [the] these recommendations [of the committee and the academy] differ, the department of health shall determine which recommendations shall apply. (c) Minimum benefits may be limited to one visit payable to one provider for all of the services provided at each visit cited in this section, except that the limitations authorized by this subsection shall not apply to immunizations recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the American Academy of Pediatrics[;], or the recommendations of the department of health made pursuant to section 321-31; provided that if [the] these recommendations [of the committee and the academy] differ, the department of health shall determine which recommendations shall apply." SECTION 7. Section 431:10A-206.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows: "(b) Child health supervision services shall include twelve visits at approximately the following intervals: birth; two months; four months; six months; nine months; twelve months; fifteen months; eighteen months; two years; three years; four years; and five years.  Services to be covered at each visit shall include a history, physical examination, developmental assessment, anticipatory guidance, immunizations, and laboratory tests, in keeping with prevailing medical standards.  For the purposes of this subsection, [the term] "prevailing medical standards" means the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the American Academy of Pediatrics[;], or the recommendations of the department of health made pursuant to section 321-31; provided that if [the] these recommendations [of the committee and the academy] differ, the department of health shall determine which recommendations shall apply. (c) Minimum benefits may be limited to one visit payable to one provider for all of the services provided at each visit cited in this section, except that the limitations authorized by this subsection shall not apply to immunizations recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the American Academy of Pediatrics[;], or the recommendations of the department of health made pursuant to section 321-31; provided that if [the] these recommendations [of the committee and the academy] differ, the department of health shall determine which recommendations shall apply." SECTION 8. Section 431:10A-207, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§431:10A-207  Coverage for specific services.  Every person insured under a group or blanket disability insurance policy shall be entitled to the reimbursements and coverages specified in [section] sections 431:10A-116[.] and 431:10A-  ." SECTION 9. Section 431:26-103, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) Network adequacy requirements shall be as follows: (1)  A health carrier providing a network plan shall maintain a network that is sufficient in numbers and appropriate types of providers, including those that serve predominantly low-income, medically underserved individuals, to assure that all covered benefits will be accessible without unreasonable travel or delay; [and] (2)  Covered persons shall have access to emergency services twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week[.]; and (3)  The network shall include an adequate number and geographic distribution of providers authorized to furnish clinical preventive services for which coverage is required under state law or rule, including services recommended by the department of health pursuant to section 321-31, to ensure timely access to those services without unreasonable travel or delay." SECTION 10. Section 432:1-602.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows: "(b) Child health supervision services shall include twelve visits at approximately the following intervals: birth; two months; four months; six months; nine months; twelve months; fifteen months; eighteen months; two years; three years; four years; and five years.  Services to be covered at each visit shall include a history, physical examination, developmental assessment, anticipatory guidance, immunizations, and laboratory tests, in keeping with prevailing medical standards.  For the purposes of this subsection, [the term] "prevailing medical standards" means the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the American Academy of Pediatrics[;], or the recommendations of the department of health made pursuant to section 321-31; provided that if [the] these recommendations [of the committee and the academy] differ, the department of health shall determine which recommendations shall apply. (c) Minimum benefits may be limited to one visit payable to one provider for all of the services provided at each visit cited in this section, except that the limitations authorized by this subsection shall not apply to immunizations recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the American Academy of Pediatrics[;], or the recommendations of the department of health made pursuant to section 321-31; provided that if [the] these recommendations [of the committee and the academy] differ, the department of health shall determine which recommendations shall apply." SECTION 11. Section 432D-23, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§432D-23  Required provisions and benefits.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each policy, contract, plan, or agreement issued in the State after January 1, 1995, by health maintenance organizations pursuant to this chapter, shall include benefits provided in sections 431:10-212, 431:10A-115, 431:10A-115.5, 431:10A-116, 431:10A-116.2, 431:10A-116.5, 431:10A-116.6, 431:10A-119, 431:10A-120, 431:10A-121, 431:10A-122, 431:10A-125, 431:10A-126, 431:10A-132, 431:10A-133, 431:10A-134, 431:10A-140, and [431:10A-134], 431:10A-   , and chapter 431M." SECTION 12. Section 432E-1.4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) For contractual purposes, a health intervention shall be covered if it is an otherwise covered category of service, not specifically excluded, recommended by the treating licensed health care provider, and determined by the health plan's medical director to be medically necessary as defined in subsection (b).  Notwithstanding any determination under this section, coverage for any clinical preventive service for which coverage is required under state law or rule, including clinical preventive services recommended by the department of health pursuant to section 321-31, shall not be denied on the basis of medical necessity or subject to prior authorization, except as permitted for reasonable medical management.  A health intervention may be medically indicated and not qualify as a covered benefit or meet the definition of medical necessity.  A managed care plan may choose to cover health interventions that do not meet the definition of medical necessity." SECTION 13.  Section 461-11.4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title and subsection (a) to read as follows: "§461-11.4 Vaccinations[; children]. (a)  A pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or registered pharmacy technician under the direct supervision of a registered pharmacist may administer a vaccine to a person three years of age or older; provided that: (1)  The vaccine is authorized or approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration[;] for any indication; (2)  The vaccine has been ordered by a registered pharmacist and administered in accordance with the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the United States Department of Health and Human Services[;], or the department of health pursuant to section 321-31; (3)  The pharmacy intern has completed a practical training program approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education that includes hands-on injection technique, clinical evaluation of indications and contraindications of vaccines, and the recognition and treatment of emergency responses to vaccines; (4)  The registered pharmacy technician has completed a practical training program approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education that includes hands-on injection technique; (5)  The registered pharmacy technician has a Certified Pharmacy Technician certification from either the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board or National Healthcareer Association; (6)  The registered pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or registered pharmacy technician has a current certificate in basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation; (7)  The registered pharmacist or registered pharmacy technician has completed a minimum of two credit hours in immunization-related continuing education courses during each licensing biennium; (8)  The registered pharmacist is in compliance with all applicable recordkeeping and reporting requirements, including complying with adverse events reporting requirements; (9)  The registered pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or registered pharmacy technician has reviewed the patient's vaccination records before administering the vaccine; (10)  The registered pharmacist has informed the patient and the patient's primary guardian or caregiver of the importance of a well-child visit with a pediatrician or other licensed primary care provider and has referred the patient as appropriate; and (11)  Where a prescription has been ordered by a person other than the registered pharmacist[,] or a standing order pursuant to section 321-31, the registered pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or registered pharmacy technician shall verify that the prescriber or the prescriber's authorized agent is the patient's medical home." SECTION 14. Notwithstanding section 23-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, this Act shall be exempt from the requirements for an impact assessment report on proposed mandatory health insurance coverage. SECTION 15. The benefit to be provided by health maintenance organizations corresponding to the benefit provided under section 431:10A-   , Hawaii Revised Statutes, if any, as contained in the amendment to section 432D-23, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in section 11 of this Act, shall take effect for all policies, contracts, plans, or agreements issued in the State after January 1, 2027. SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the coverage for evidence-based clinical preventive services required under sections 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 10, 11, and 12 of this Act shall apply to all health benefits plans under chapter 87A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in the State. SECTION 17. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 18. In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 19. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 20. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.